Utah statutes.
72-7-401.   Application of size, weight, and load limitations for vehicles -- Exceptions.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the maximum size, weight, and load limitations on vehicles under this part apply to all highways throughout the state.

(b)  Local authorities may not alter the limitations except as expressly provided under Sections 41-6a-204 and 72-7-408.

(2)  Except as specifically made applicable, the size, weight, and load limitations in this chapter do not apply to:

(a)  fire-fighting apparatus;

(b)  highway construction and maintenance equipment being operated at the site of maintenance or at a construction project as authorized by a highway authority;

(c)  highway construction and maintenance equipment temporarily being operated between a material site and a highway maintenance site or a highway construction project if:

(i)  the section of any highway being used is not located within a county of the first or second class;

(ii)  authorized for a specific highway project by the highway authority having jurisdiction over each highway being used;

(iii)  the distance between the material site and maintenance site or highway construction project does not exceed 10 miles; and

(iv)  the operator carries in the vehicle written verification of the authorization from the highway authority having jurisdiction over each highway being used;

(d)  implements of husbandry incidentally moved on a highway while engaged in  an agricultural operation or incidentally moved for repair or servicing, subject to the provisions of Section 72-7-407;

(e)  vehicles transporting logs or poles from forest to sawmill:

(i)  when required to move upon a highway other than the national system of interstate and defense highways;

(ii)  if the gross vehicle weight does not exceed 80,000 pounds; and

(iii)  the vehicle or combination of vehicles are in compliance with Subsections 72-7-404(1) and (2)(a); and

(f)  tow trucks or towing vehicles under emergency conditions when:

(i)  it becomes necessary to move a vehicle, combination of vehicles, special mobile equipment, or objects to the nearest safe area for parking or temporary storage;

(ii)  no other alternative is available; and

(iii)  the movement is for the safety of the traveling public.

(3) (a)  Except when operating on the national system of interstate and defense highways, a motor vehicle carrying livestock as defined in Section 4-1-8, or a motor vehicle carrying raw grain if the grain is being transported by the farmer from his farm to market prior to bagging, weighing, or processing, may exceed by up to 2,000 pounds the tandem axle weight limitations specified under Section 72-7-404 without obtaining an overweight permit under Section 72-7-406.

(b)  Subsection (3)(a) is an exception to Sections 72-7-404 and 72-7-406.

